src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/Num-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: tuhandelgi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+All: tuhandele
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+All+Foc/gi: tuhandelegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ela: tuhandest
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: tuhandestki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: tuhandes
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: tuhandeski
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: tuhande
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: tuhandegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par: tuhandet
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: tuhandetki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: tuhandeisse
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tuhandeissegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: tuhandeiks
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tuhandeikski
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: tuhandeilt
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tuhandeiltki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: tuhandeil
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tuhandeilgi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: tuhandeile
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tuhandeilegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: tuhandeist
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tuhandeistki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: tuhandeis
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tuhandeiski
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: tuhandetesse
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: tuhandetessegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Com: tuhandetega
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: tuhandetegagi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Abe: tuhandeteta
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: tuhandetetagi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ess: tuhandetena
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: tuhandetenagi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Trm: tuhandeteni
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: tuhandetenigi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Tra: tuhandeteks
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: tuhandetekski
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Abl: tuhandetelt
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: tuhandeteltki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ade: tuhandetel
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: tuhandetelgi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+All: tuhandetele
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+All+Foc/gi: tuhandetelegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ela: tuhandetest
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: tuhandetestki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: tuhandetes
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: tuhandeteski
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: tuhandete
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: tuhandetegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: tuhat
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: tuhatki
